Washington statutes.
RCW 7.44.031

Recognizance of defendant—Discharge by securing performance.

Instead of giving special bail, as above provided, the defendant shall be entitled to his or her discharge from custody if he or she will secure the performance of the contract to the satisfaction of the plaintiff.

[ 2011 c 336 s 209; Code 1881 s 639; 1877 p 133 s 642; 1869 p 150 s 579; 1854 p 209 s 421; RRS s 780, part. Formerly RCW 7.44.030, part.]